Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-504 Liquidation of damages.
(a) Damages payable by either party for default, or any other act or omission,
including indemnity for loss or diminution of anticipated tax benefits or loss
or damage to lessor's residual interest, may be liquidated in the lease
agreement but only at an amount or by a formula that is reasonable in light of
the then anticipated harm caused by the default or other act or omission.

(b) If the lease agreement provides for
liquidation of damages, and such provision does not comply with subsection (a),
or such provision is an exclusive or limited remedy that circumstances cause to
fail of its essential purpose, remedy may be had as provided in this article.

(c) If the lessor justifiably withholds or
stops delivery of goods because of the lessee's default or insolvency (section
490:2A-525 or 490:2A-526), the lessee is entitled to restitution of any amount
by which the sum of the lessee's payments exceeds:

(1) The amount to which the lessor is entitled by
virtue of terms liquidating the lessor's damages in accordance with subsection
(a); or

(2) In the absence of those terms, twenty per cent of
the then present value of the total rent the lessee was obligated to pay for
the balance of the lease term, or, in the case of a consumer lease, the lesser
of such amount or $500.

(d) A lessee's right to restitution under
subsection (c) is subject to offset to the extent the lessor establishes:

(1) A right to recover damages under the provisions
of this article other than subsection (a); and

(2) The amount or value of any benefits received by
the lessee directly or indirectly by reason of the lease contract. [L 1991, c
40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next